Washington statutes.
RCW 11.48.030

Chargeable with whole estate.

Every personal representative shall be chargeable in his or her accounts with the whole estate of the deceased which may come into his or her possession. He or she shall not be responsible for loss or decrease or destruction of any of the property or effects of the estate, without his or her fault.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2032; 1965 c 145 s 11.48.030. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 155; RRS s 1525; prior: Code 1881 s 1538; 1860 p 210 s 241; 1854 p 295 s 161.]